District of Columbia statutes.
34-2409.02

Rates.

The fireplug tax shall be levied with reference to the value of the building so taxed, and shall not be more than $5 nor less than $1 per year.

R.S., D.C., § 206
1981 Ed., § 43-1535.
1973 Ed., § 43-1526.